Utah statutes.
53-11-115.   License fees -- Deposit in General Fund.
(1)  Fees for licensure, registration, and renewal are:
(a)  for an original bail enforcement agent license application and license,
$250, which shall include the costs of fingerprint processing and background
investigation;
(b)  for the renewal of a bail enforcement agent or bail bond recovery agency
license, $150;
(c)  for an original bail recovery agent license application and license,
$150, which shall include the costs of fingerprint processing and background
investigation;
(d)  for the renewal of each bail recovery agent license, $100;
(e)  for an original bail recovery apprentice license application and license,
$150, which shall include the costs of fingerprint processing and background
investigation;
(f)  for the renewal of each bail recovery apprentice license, $100;
(g)  for filing a renewal application under Subsection (1)(b) more than 30
days after the expiration date of the license, a delinquency fee of $50;
(h)  for filing a renewal application under Subsection (1)(d) more than 30
days after the expiration date of the registration, a delinquency fee of $30;
(i)  for filing a renewal application under Subsection (1)(f) more than 30
days after the expiration date of the apprentice license, a delinquency fee of
$30;
(j)  for the reinstatement of a bail enforcement agent or bail bond recovery
agency license, $50;
(k)  for a duplicate identification card, $10; and
(l)  for reinstatement of an identification card, $10.
(2) (a)  The board may renew a license granted under this chapter upon receipt
of an application on forms as prescribed by the board and upon receipt of the
fees prescribed in Subsection (1).
(b)  The renewal of a bail enforcement agent, bail recovery agent, or bail
recovery apprentice license requires the filing of a liability insurance
policy as described in Subsections 53-9-109(2) and (3).
(c)  A license may not be renewed more than 90 days after its expiration.
(d)  A licensee may not engage in any activity subject to this chapter during
any period between the date of expiration of the license and the renewal of
the license.
(3) (a)  The board may reinstate a suspended license upon completion of the
term of suspension.
(b)  Renewal of the license does not entitle the licensee, while the license
remains suspended and until it is reinstated, to engage in any activity
regulated by this chapter, or in any other activity or conduct in violation of
the order or judgment by which the license was suspended.
(4)  The board may not reinstate a revoked license or accept an application
for a license from a person whose license has been revoked for at least one
year after the date of revocation.
(5)  All fees collected by the department under this section shall be
deposited in the General Fund.
